Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [124D.351] SKILLS PATH PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of the skills path program is to provide students with clear pathways from high school to careers in skilled work and the trades and create opportunities for students to enter postsecondary programs and employment-based training in high school. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Career and technical education dual credit program" means a postsecondary career or technical education course under section 124D.09, subdivision 5a; a secondary course that has a current articulation agreement for postsecondary credit hours with a participating institution; or a youth skills training program that awards postsecondary credit to students. new text end new text begin (c) "Employment-based training" means a registered apprenticeship or apprenticeship readiness program, a dual-training program, a workforce training program at an opportunities industrialization center, or other work-based learning programs in which the student has paid employment. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible institutions. new text end new text begin (a) A secondary public school, an American Indian-controlled Tribal contract or grant school eligible for aid under section 124D.83, vocational center school, or a nonpublic school, or any combination of schools, is eligible to apply for a skills path program designation. new text end new text begin (b) A Minnesota state college or university, an institution licensed or registered as a postsecondary institution by the Office of Higher Education, or an institution exempt from the provisions of sections 136A.61 to 136A.71, or 136A.822 to 136A.834, as approved by the Office of Higher Education may partner with an institution in paragraph (a) to provide a postsecondary options enrollment career and technical education course for eligible students in a skills path program. new text end new text begin (c) An eligible institution may work in partnership with one or more postsecondary programs designated in paragraph (b) to create a two-year program that incorporates secondary and postsecondary credit along with employment-based training to award an associate degree in skilled occupations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Skills path programs. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must develop an application for programs that provide students with clear pathways from high school to careers in skilled work and the trades to be designated as skills path programs. Skills path programs must include career connected learning options, career and technical education dual credit program options, and employment-based training opportunities to be eligible for this designation. Applicants must demonstrate how skills path programs will be marketed to students and what other local partners and employers are involved in developing career pathway opportunities. Skills path programs may be identified in skilled occupations and the trades, including manufacturing, construction, health care services, information technology, agriculture, transportation, child care, law enforcement, energy, and other related industries. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Interaction with education finance. new text end new text begin For the purpose of computing state aids for the school district, students participating in the skills path programs under this section shall be counted in the average daily membership of the school district. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Academic credit. new text end new text begin A school district may grant academic credit for skills path programs under this section in accordance with local requirements. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [124D.352] SKILLS PATH GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education shall award grants up to $50,000 per grant to up to ten secondary schools annually for skills path programs that align career and technical education dual credit program options with employment-based training opportunities. Applications must demonstrate how grant funding will provide students with clear pathways from high school to postsecondary training that lead to careers in skilled work and the trades. The commissioner of education may work with the commissioner of higher education and the commissioner of labor and industry to develop the grant application and administer the grants. new text end new text begin (b) A secondary school awarded a grant under this section must use the grant award for any of the following implementation and coordination activities: new text end new text begin (1) marketing efforts to students about skills path program opportunities; new text end new text begin (2) coordinating academic, vocational, and occupational learning, school-based and work-based learning, and secondary and postsecondary education for participants in the program; new text end new text begin (3) reimbursement of tuition, books, required tools, and other expenses necessary for participation in the program; and new text end new text begin (4) any other implementation or coordination activity that the commissioner may direct or permit the eligible institution to perform. new text end new text begin (c) Grant awards may not be used to pay the wages of a student directly or indirectly. new text end new text begin (d) The following information must be included in the grant application: new text end new text begin (1) the identity of each secondary school that is a participant in the skills path program; new text end new text begin (2) the identity of each registered apprenticeship program or apprenticeship readiness program, dual-training program, workforce training program at an opportunities industrialization center, or other work-based learning program in which the student has the opportunity for paid employment that is a participant in the skills path program; new text end new text begin (3) the identity of each postsecondary institution, intermediate school district, public agency, nonprofit organization, union, career and technical education consortium, or workforce development authority that is a participant in the skills path program; new text end new text begin (4) the identity of any employers participating in the skills path program; new text end new text begin (5) a description of any career connected learning components; new text end new text begin (6) a description of the career and technical education dual-credit program options; new text end new text begin (7) a description of any postsecondary education components in the skills path program; new text end new text begin (8) a description of employment-based training opportunities; and new text end new text begin (9) applicable career planning information. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin SKILLS PATH PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Commissioner of education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Skills path program. new text end new text begin (a) To administer skills path grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.352: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The base for this program for fiscal year 2028 and later is $500,000. new text end